Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-737
District; eminent domain; procedure.

Whenever the board of trustees or administrator of any sanitary and improvement district shall by order determine to make any public improvement under the provisions of sections 31-727 to 31-762 and 31-771 to 31-780 which shall require that private property be taken or damaged, the district may exercise the power of eminent domain. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 11, p. 199;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 79, p. 482;

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 6.